Hawaii, session 2026, SB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 134-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  The manufacture, possession, sale, barter, trade, gift, transfer, or acquisition of detachable ammunition magazines with a capacity in excess of ten rounds [which] that are designed for or capable of use with a pistol is prohibited. The manufacture, possession, sale, barter, trade, gift, transfer, or acquisition of any detachable ammunition magazine with a capacity in excess of thirty rounds that is designed for or capable of use with any firearm other than a pistol is prohibited. This subsection shall not apply to magazines originally designed to accept more than ten rounds of ammunition [which] that have been modified to accept [no] not more than ten rounds and which are not capable of being readily restored to a capacity of more than ten rounds." SECTION 2. This Act shall not prohibit possession of a detachable ammunition magazine with a capacity in excess of thirty rounds that is designed for or capable of use with any firearm other than a pistol that was legally obtained prior to the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.